Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1201.02
Department
of Economic Development; created; purpose; duties.

There is hereby created an executive department of state government
to be known as the Department of Economic Development. The
purpose of the department is to
maintain and develop the economy of the state to provide opportunities for
the people which will enhance and expand the quality of their lives. The department shall promote
the:

(1) Expansion of personal income through the development of
business and employment opportunities which afford sufficient compensation
to ensure an adequate standard of living for the people of the state;

(2) Development of an economy that contributes to and enhances
the environmental quality of the state;

(3) Development of a stable economy within the state;

(4) Development of economic health and opportunities throughout
the communities and counties of the state;

(5) Development of an economy which is capable of providing
the necessary revenue for state government, local governments, and other political
subdivisions of the state and in this way minimize the tax burden faced by
all taxpayers of the state; and

(6) Structuring of the department and its staff as a nonpolitical,
professionally managed division of state government.

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 11.